California statutes. Penal Code
(g) It shall be a defense in any prosecution for a violation of subdivision (a) by a person who knowingly distributed any harmful matter by the use of telephones or telephone facilities to any person under the age of 18 years that the defendant has taken either of the following measures to restrict access to the harmful matter by persons under 18 years of age:

(1) Required the person receiving the harmful matter to use an authorized access or identification code, as provided by the information provider, before transmission of the harmful matter begins, where the defendant previously has issued the code by mailing it to the applicant after taking reasonable measures to ascertain that the applicant was 18 years of age or older and has established a procedure to immediately cancel the code of any person after receiving notice, in writing or by telephone, that the code has been lost, stolen, or used by persons under the age of 18 years or that the code is no longer desired.

(2) Required payment by credit card before transmission of the matter.

(h) It shall be a defense in any prosecution for a violation of paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) that the defendant has taken either of the following measures to restrict access to the harmful matter by persons under 18 years of age:

(1) Required the person receiving the harmful matter to use an authorized access or identification card to the vending machine after taking reasonable measures to ascertain that the applicant was 18 years of age or older and has established a procedure to immediately cancel the card of any person after receiving notice, in writing or by telephone, that the code has been lost, stolen, or used by persons under the age of 18 years or that the card is no longer desired.

(2) Required the person receiving the harmful matter to use a token in order to utilize the vending machine after taking reasonable measures to ascertain that the person was 18 years of age or older.

(i) Any list of applicants or recipients compiled or maintained by an information-access service provider for purposes of compliance with paragraph (1) of subdivision (g) is confidential and shall not be sold or otherwise disseminated except upon order of the court.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 38, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

313.2.

(a) Nothing in this chapter shall prohibit any parent or guardian from distributing any harmful matter to his child or ward or permitting his child or ward to attend an exhibition of any harmful matter if the child or ward is accompanied by him.

(b) Nothing in this chapter shall prohibit any person from exhibiting any harmful matter to any of the following:

(1) A minor who is accompanied by his parent or guardian.

(2) A minor who is accompanied by an adult who represents himself to be the parent or guardian of the minor and whom the person, by the exercise of reasonable care, does not have reason to know is not the parent or guardian of the minor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1970, Ch. 257.)
-------------------------------------------

313.3.

It shall be a defense in any prosecution for a violation of this chapter that the act charged was committed in aid of legitimate scientific or educational purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 248.)
-------------------------------------------

313.4.

Every person who violates Section 313.1, other than subdivision (e), is punishable by fine of not more than two thousand dollars ($2,000), by imprisonment in the county jail for not more than one year, or by both that fine and imprisonment. However, if the person has been previously convicted of a violation of Section 313.1, other than subdivision (e), or of any section of Chapter 7.5 (commencing with Section 311) of Title 9 of Part 1 of this code, the person shall be punished by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 325.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

313.5.

If any phrase, clause, sentence, section or provision of this chapter or application thereof to any person or circumstance is held invalid, such invalidity shall not affect any other phrase, clause, sentence, section, provision or application of this chapter, which can be given effect without the invalid phrase, clause, sentence, section, provision or application and to this end the provisions of this chapter are declared to be severable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 248.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 8. Indecent Exposure, Obscene Exhibitions, and Bawdy and Other Disorderly Houses [314. - 318.6.]

314.

Every person who willfully and lewdly, either:
1. Exposes his person, or the private parts thereof, in any public place, or in any place where there are present other persons to be offended or annoyed thereby; or,2. Procures, counsels, or assists any person so to expose himself or take part in any model artist exhibition, or to make any other exhibition of himself to public view, or the view of any number of persons, such as is offensive to decency, or is adapted to excite to vicious or lewd thoughts or acts,
is guilty of a misdemeanor.

Every person who violates subdivision 1 of this section after having entered, without consent, an inhabited dwelling house, or trailer coach as defined in Section 635 of the Vehicle Code, or the inhabited portion of any other building, is punishable by imprisonment in the state prison, or in the county jail not exceeding one year.

Upon the second and each subsequent conviction under subdivision 1 of this section, or upon a first conviction under subdivision 1 of this section after a previous conviction under Section 288, every person so convicted is guilty of a felony, and is punishable by imprisonment in state prison.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1113, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

315.

Every person who keeps a house of ill-fame in this state, resorted to for the purposes of prostitution or lewdness, or who willfully resides in such house, is guilty of a misdemeanor; and in all prosecutions for keeping or resorting to such a house common repute may be received as competent evidence of the character of the house, the purpose for which it is kept or used, and the character of the women inhabiting or resorting to it.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1905, Ch. 507.)
-------------------------------------------

316.

Every person who keeps any disorderly house, or any house for the purpose of assignation or prostitution, or any house of public resort, by which the peace, comfort, or decency of the immediate neighborhood is habitually disturbed, or who keeps any inn in a disorderly manner; and every person who lets any apartment or tenement, knowing that it is to be used for the purpose of assignation or prostitution, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1360, Sec. 108.)
-------------------------------------------

318.

Whoever, through invitation or device, prevails upon any person to visit any room, building, or other places kept for the purpose of illegal gambling or prostitution, is guilty of a misdemeanor, and, upon conviction thereof, shall be confined in the county jail not exceeding six months, or fined not exceeding five hundred dollars ($500), or be punished by both that fine and imprisonment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 684, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

318.5.

(a) Nothing in this code shall invalidate an ordinance of, or be construed to prohibit the adoption of an ordinance by, a county or city, if that ordinance directly regulates the exposure of the genitals or buttocks of any person, or the breasts of any female person, who acts as a waiter, waitress, or entertainer, whether or not the owner of the establishment in which the activity is performed employs or pays any compensation to that person to perform the activity, in an adult or sexually oriented business. For purposes of this section, an “adult or sexually oriented business” includes any establishment that regularly features live performances which are distinguished or characterized by an emphasis on the exposure of the genitals or buttocks of any person, or the breasts of any female person, or specified sexual activities that involve the exposure of the genitals or buttocks of any person, or the breasts of any female person.

(b) The provisions of this section shall not be construed to apply to any adult or sexually oriented business, as defined herein, that has been adjudicated by a court of competent jurisdiction to be, or by action of a local body such as issuance of an adult entertainment establishment license or permit allowing the business to operate on or before July 1, 1998, as, a theater, concert hall, or similar establishment primarily devoted to theatrical performances for purposes of this section.

This section shall be known and may be cited as the “Quimby-Walsh Act.”

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 294, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

318.6.

(a) Nothing in this code shall invalidate an ordinance of, or be construed to prohibit the adoption of an ordinance by, a city or county, if that ordinance relates to any live acts, demonstrations, or exhibitions occurring within adult or sexually oriented businesses and involve the exposure of the genitals or buttocks of any participant or the breasts of any female participant, and if that ordinance prohibits an act or acts which are not expressly authorized or prohibited by this code.

(b) For purposes of this section, an “adult or sexually oriented business” includes any establishment that regularly features live performances which are distinguished or characterized by an emphasis on the exposure of the genitals or buttocks of any person, or the breasts of any female person or sexual activities that involve the exposure of the genitals or buttocks of any person, or the breasts of any female person.

(c) The provisions of this section shall not be construed to apply to any adult or sexually oriented business, as defined herein, that has been adjudicated by a court of competent jurisdiction to be, or by action of a local body such as issuance of an adult entertainment establishment license or permit allowing the business to operate on or before July 1, 1998, as, a theater, concert hall, or similar establishment primarily devoted to theatrical performances for purposes of this section.

(d) This section shall not be construed to preempt the legislative body of any city or county from regulating an adult or sexually oriented business, or similar establishment, in the manner and to the extent permitted by the United States Constitution and the California Constitution.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 294, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 9. Lotteries [319. - 329.]

319.

A lottery is any scheme for the disposal or distribution of property by chance, among persons who have paid or promised to pay any valuable consideration for the chance of obtaining such property or a portion of it, or for any share or any interest in such property, upon any agreement, understanding, or expectation that it is to be distributed or disposed of by lot or chance, whether called a lottery, raffle, or gift enterprise, or by whatever name the same may be known.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

319.3.

(a) In addition to Section 319, a lottery also shall include a grab bag game which is a scheme whereby, for the disposal or distribution of sports trading cards by chance, a person pays valuable consideration to purchase a sports trading card grab bag with the understanding that the purchaser has a chance to win a designated prize or prizes listed by the seller as being contained in one or more, but not all, of the grab bags.

(b) For purposes of this section, the following
 definitions shall apply:

(1) “Sports trading card grab bag” means a sealed package which contains one or more sports trading cards that have been removed from the manufacturer’s original packaging. A “sports trading card grab bag” does not include a sweepstakes, or procedure for the distribution of any sports trading card of value by lot or by chance, which is not unlawful under other provisions of law.

(2) “Sports trading card” means any card produced for use in commerce that contains a company name or logo, or both, and an image, representation, or facsimile of one or more players or other team member or members in any pose, and that is produced pursuant to an appropriate licensing agreement.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1074, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

319.5.

Neither this chapter nor Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 330) applies to the possession or operation of a reverse vending machine. As used in this section a reverse vending machine is a machine in which empty beverage containers are deposited for recycling and which provides a payment of money, merchandise, vouchers, or other incentives at a frequency less than upon each deposit. The pay out of a reverse vending machine is made on a deposit selected at random within the designated number of required deposits.

The deposit of an empty beverage container in a reverse vending machine does
 not constitute consideration within the definition of lottery in Section 319.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 456, Sec. 1.   Effective July 8, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

320.

Every person who contrives, prepares, sets up, proposes, or draws any lottery, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

320.5.

(a) Nothing in this chapter applies to any raffle conducted by an eligible organization as defined in subdivision (c) for the purpose of directly supporting beneficial or charitable purposes or financially supporting another private, nonprofit, eligible organization that performs beneficial or charitable purposes if the raffle is conducted in accordance with this section.

(b) For purposes of this section, “raffle” means a scheme for the distribution of prizes by chance among persons who have paid money for paper tickets that provide the opportunity to win these prizes, where all of the following are true:

(1) Each ticket is sold with a detachable coupon or stub, and both the ticket and its associated coupon or stub are marked with a unique and matching identifier.

(2) Winners of the prizes are determined by draw from among the coupons or stubs described in paragraph (1) that have been detached from all tickets sold for entry in the draw.

(3) The draw is conducted in California under the supervision of a natural person who is 18 years of age or older.

(4) (A) At least 90 percent of the gross receipts generated from the sale of raffle tickets for any given draw are used by the eligible organization conducting the raffle to benefit or provide support for beneficial or charitable purposes, or it may use those revenues to benefit another private, nonprofit organization, provided that an organization receiving these funds is itself an eligible organization as defined in subdivision (c). As used in this section, “beneficial purposes” excludes purposes that are intended to benefit officers, directors, or members, as defined by Section 5056 of the Corporations Code, of the eligible organization. In no event shall funds raised by raffles conducted pursuant to this section be used to fund any beneficial, charitable, or other purpose outside of California. This section does not preclude an eligible organization from using funds from sources other than the sale of raffle tickets to pay for the administration or other costs of
 conducting a raffle.

(B) An employee of an eligible organization who is a direct seller of raffle tickets shall not be treated as an employee for purposes of workers’ compensation under Section 3351 of the Labor Code if the following conditions are satisfied:

(i) Substantially all of the remuneration (whether or not paid in cash) for the performance of the service of selling raffle tickets is directly related to sales rather than to the number of hours worked.

(ii) The services performed by the person are performed pursuant to a written contract between the seller and the eligible organization and the contract provides that the person will not be treated as an employee with respect to the selling of raffle tickets for workers’ compensation purposes.

(C) For purposes of this section, employees selling raffle tickets shall be deemed to be direct sellers as described in Section 650 of the Unemployment Insurance Code as long as they meet the requirements of that section.

(c) For purposes of this section, “eligible organization” means a private, nonprofit organization that has been qualified to conduct business in California for at least one year prior to conducting a raffle and is exempt from taxation pursuant to Sections 23701a, 23701b, 23701d, 23701e, 23701f, 23701g, 23701k, 23701l, 23701t, or 23701w of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(d) Any person who receives compensation in connection with the operation of the raffle shall be an employee of the eligible organization that is conducting the raffle, and in no event may compensation be paid from revenues required to be dedicated to beneficial or charitable
 purposes.

(e) No raffle otherwise permitted under this section may be conducted by means of, or otherwise utilize, any gaming machine, apparatus, or device, whether or not that machine, apparatus, or device meets the definition of slot machine contained in Section 330a, 330b, or 330.1.

(f) (1) No raffle otherwise permitted under this section may be conducted, nor may tickets for a raffle be sold, within an operating satellite wagering facility or racetrack inclosure licensed pursuant to the Horse Racing Law (Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 19400) of Division 8 of the Business and Professions Code) or within a gambling establishment licensed pursuant to the Gambling Control Act (Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 19800) of Division 8 of the Business and Professions Code).

(2) A raffle may not
 be operated or conducted in any manner over the Internet, nor may raffle tickets be sold, traded, or redeemed over the Internet. For purposes of this paragraph, an eligible organization shall not be deemed to operate or conduct a raffle over the Internet, or sell raffle tickets over the Internet, if the eligible organization advertises its raffle on the Internet or permits others to do so. Information that may be conveyed on an Internet Web site pursuant to this paragraph includes, but is not limited to, all of the following:

(A) Lists, descriptions, photographs, or videos of the raffle prizes.

(B) Lists of the prize winners.

(C) The rules of the raffle.

(D) Frequently asked questions and their answers.

(E) Raffle entry forms, which may be downloaded from the Internet Web site for manual completion by raffle ticket purchasers, but shall not be submitted to the eligible organization through the Internet.

(F) Raffle contact information, including the eligible organization’s name, address, telephone number, facsimile number, or e-mail address.

(g) No individual, corporation, partnership, or other legal entity shall hold a financial interest in the conduct of a raffle, except the eligible organization that is itself authorized to conduct that raffle, and any private, nonprofit, eligible organizations receiving financial support from that charitable organization pursuant to subdivisions (a) and (b).

(h) (1) An eligible organization may not
 conduct a raffle authorized under this section, unless it registers annually with the Department of Justice. The department shall furnish a registration form via the Internet or upon request to eligible nonprofit organizations. The department shall, by regulation, collect only the information necessary to carry out the provisions of this section on this form. This information shall include, but is not limited to, the following:

(A) The name and address of the eligible organization.

(B) The federal tax identification number, the corporate number issued by the Secretary of State, the organization number issued by the Franchise Tax Board, or the California charitable trust identification number of the eligible organization.

(C) The name and title of a responsible fiduciary of the organization.

(2) The department may require an eligible organization to pay an annual registration fee of ten dollars ($10) to cover the actual costs of the department to administer and enforce this section. The department may, by regulation, adjust the annual registration fee as needed to ensure that revenues willfully offset, but do not exceed, the actual costs incurred by the department pursuant to this section. The fee shall be deposited by the department into the General Fund.

(3) The department shall receive General Fund moneys for the costs incurred pursuant to this section subject to an appropriation by the Legislature.

(4) The department shall adopt regulations necessary to effectuate this section, including emergency regulations, pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of
 Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(5) The department shall maintain an automated database of all registrants. Each local law enforcement agency shall notify the department of any arrests or investigation that may result in an administrative or criminal action against a registrant. The department may audit the records and other documents of a registrant to ensure compliance with this section.

(6) Once registered, an eligible organization must file annually thereafter with the department a report that includes the following:

(A) The aggregate gross receipts from the operation of raffles.

(B) The aggregate direct costs incurred by the eligible organization from the operation of raffles.

(C) The charitable or beneficial purposes for which proceeds of the raffles were used, or identify the eligible recipient organization to which proceeds were directed, and the amount of those proceeds.

(7) The department shall annually furnish to registrants a form to collect this information.

(8) The registration and reporting provisions of this section do not apply to any religious corporation sole or other religious corporation or organization that holds property for religious purposes, to a cemetery corporation regulated under Chapter 19 of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code, or to any committee as defined in Section 82013 that is required to and does file any statement pursuant to the provisions of Article 2 (commencing with Section 84200) of Chapter 4 of Title 9, or to a charitable corporation organized
 and operated primarily as a religious organization, educational institution, hospital, or a health care service plan licensed pursuant to Section 1349 of the Health and Safety Code.

(i) The department may take legal action against a registrant if it determines that the registrant has violated this section or any regulation adopted pursuant to this section, or that the registrant has engaged in any conduct that is not in the best interests of the public’s health, safety, or general welfare. Any action taken pursuant to this subdivision does not prohibit the commencement of an administrative or criminal action by the Attorney General, a district attorney, city attorney, or county counsel.

(j) Each action and hearing conducted to deny, revoke, or suspend a registry, or other administrative action taken against a registrant shall be conducted pursuant to the Administrative Procedure
 Act (Chapters 4.5 (commencing with Section 11400) and 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code). The department may seek recovery of the costs incurred in investigating or prosecuting an action against a registrant or applicant in accordance with those procedures specified in Section 125.3 of the Business and Professions Code. A proceeding conducted under this subdivision is subject to judicial review pursuant to Section 1094.5 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(k) The Department of Justice shall conduct a study and report to the Legislature by December 31, 2003, on the impact of this section on raffle practices in California. Specifically, the study shall include, but not be limited to, information on whether the number of raffles has increased, the amount of money raised through raffles and whether this amount has increased, whether there are consumer complaints, and whether there is increased
 fraud in the operation of raffles.

(l) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2001.

(m) A raffle shall be exempt from this section if it satisfies all of the following requirements:

(1) It involves a general and indiscriminate distribution of the tickets.

(2) The tickets are offered on the same terms and conditions as the tickets for which a donation is given.

(3) The scheme does not require any of the participants to pay for a chance to win.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 38, Sec. 1.   (SB 200)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

320.6.

(a) For the purposes of this section, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “Charitable purposes” excludes purposes that are intended to benefit officers, directors, or members, as defined by Section 5056 of the Corporations Code, of the eligible organization.

(2) “Eligible organization” means a private, nonprofit organization established by, or affiliated with, a team from the Major League
 Baseball, National Hockey League, National Basketball Association, National Football League, Women’s National Basketball Association, or Major League Soccer, or a private, nonprofit organization established by the Professional Golfers’ Association of America, Ladies Professional Golf Association, or National Association for Stock Car Auto Racing that has been qualified to conduct business in California for at least one year before conducting a raffle, is qualified for an exemption under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code, and is exempt from taxation pursuant to Section 23701a, 23701b, 23701d, 23701e, 23701f, 23701g, 23701k, 23701l, 23701t, or 23701w of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(3) “Raffle” means a scheme for the distribution of prizes by chance among persons who have paid money for paper tickets that provide the
 opportunity to win these prizes, in which all of the following are true:

(A) Each ticket sold contains a unique and matching identifier.

(B) (i) Winners of the prizes are determined by a manual draw from tickets described in subparagraph (A) that have been sold for entry in the manual draw.

(ii) An electronic device may be used to sell tickets. The ticket receipt issued by the electronic device to the purchaser may include more than one unique and matching identifier, representative of and matched to the number of tickets purchased in a single transaction.

(iii) A random number generator is not used for the manual draw or to sell tickets.

(iv) The prize paid to the
 winner is comprised of one-half or 50 percent of the gross receipts generated from the sale of raffle tickets for a raffle.

(C) The manual draw is conducted in California under the supervision of a natural person who meets all of the following requirements:

(i) The person is 18 years of age or older.

(ii) The person is affiliated with the eligible organization conducting the raffle.

(iii) The person is registered with the Department of Justice pursuant to paragraph (4) of subdivision (n).

(D) (i) Fifty percent of the gross receipts generated from the sale of raffle tickets for any given manual draw are used by the eligible organization conducting the raffle solely for
 charitable purposes, or used to benefit another private, nonprofit organization, provided that an organization receiving these funds is itself an eligible organization as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 320.5. Funds raised by raffles conducted pursuant to this section shall not be used to fund any beneficial, charitable, or other purpose outside of California. This section does not preclude an eligible organization from using funds from sources other than the sale of raffle tickets to pay for the administration or other costs of conducting a raffle if these expenses comply with legal standard of care requirements described in Sections 5231, 7231, and 9241 of the Corporations Code.

(ii) An employee of an eligible organization who is a direct seller of raffle tickets shall not be treated as an employee for purposes of workers’ compensation under Section 3351 of the Labor Code if both of the following conditions are satisfied:

(I) Substantially all of the remuneration, whether or not paid in cash, for the performance of the service of selling raffle tickets is directly related to sales rather than to the number of hours worked.

(II) The services performed by the person are performed pursuant to a written contract between the seller and the eligible organization and the contract provides that the person will not be treated as an employee with respect to the selling of raffle tickets for workers’ compensation purposes.

(iii) For purposes of this section, an employee selling raffle tickets shall be deemed to be a direct seller, as described in Section 650 of the Unemployment Insurance Code, as long as the employee meets the requirements of that section.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 320.5, this section applies to an eligible organization.

(c) A raffle that is conducted by an eligible organization for the purpose of directly supporting beneficial or charitable purposes or financially supporting another private, nonprofit eligible organization, as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 320.5, that performs beneficial or charitable purposes may be conducted in accordance with this section.

(d) A person who receives compensation in connection with the operation of the raffle shall be an employee of the eligible organization that is conducting the raffle, and in no event may compensation be paid from revenues required to be dedicated to beneficial or charitable purposes.

(e) A raffle ticket shall not be sold in exchange for
 Bitcoin or any other cryptocurrency.

(f) A raffle that is otherwise permitted under this section shall not be conducted by means of, or otherwise utilize, any gaming machine that meets the definition of slot machine contained in Section 330a, 330b, or 330.1.

(g) (1) A raffle otherwise permitted under this
 section shall not be conducted, nor may tickets for a raffle be sold, within an operating satellite wagering facility or racetrack inclosure licensed pursuant to the Horse Racing Law (Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 19400) of Division 8 of the Business and Professions Code) or within a gambling establishment licensed pursuant to the Gambling Control Act (Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 19800) of Division 8 of the Business and Professions Code).

(2) A raffle shall not be operated or conducted in any manner over the internet, nor may raffle tickets be sold, traded, or redeemed over the internet. For purposes of this paragraph, an eligible organization shall not be deemed to operate or conduct a raffle over the internet, or sell raffle tickets over the internet, if the eligible organization advertises its raffle on the internet or permits others to do so. Information that may be conveyed on an internet website pursuant to this paragraph
 includes, but is not limited to, all of the following:

(A) Lists, descriptions, photographs, or videos of the raffle prizes.

(B) Lists of the prize winners.

(C) The rules of the raffle.

(D) Frequently asked questions and their answers.

(E) Raffle entry forms, which may be downloaded from the internet website for manual completion by raffle ticket purchasers, but shall not be submitted to the eligible organization through the internet.

(F) Raffle contact information, including the eligible organization’s name, address, telephone number, facsimile number, or email address.

(h) An individual, corporation, partnership, or other legal entity shall not hold a financial interest in the conduct of a raffle, except the eligible organization that is itself authorized to conduct that raffle, and any private, nonprofit, eligible organizations receiving financial support from that charitable organization pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) and subdivision (c).

(i) (1) An eligible organization may conduct a major league sports raffle only at a home
 game, or a championship game if held at the designated venue where an affiliated sports team plays their home games.

(2) An eligible organization shall not conduct more than one major league sports raffle per game.

(j) An employee shall not sell raffle tickets in any seating area designated as a family section.

(k) An eligible organization shall disclose to all ticket purchasers the designated private, nonprofit, eligible organization for which the raffle is being conducted.

(l) An eligible organization that conducts a raffle to financially support another private, nonprofit eligible organization, as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 320.5, shall distribute all proceeds not paid out to the winners of the prizes to the private, nonprofit organization within 15 days of conducting the raffle, in accordance
 with this section.

(m) Any raffle prize remaining unclaimed by a winner at the end of the season for a team with an affiliated eligible organization that conducted a raffle to financially support another private, nonprofit eligible organization, as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 320.5, shall be donated within 30 days from the end of the season by the eligible organization to the designated private, nonprofit organization for which the raffle was conducted.

(n) (1) (A) An eligible organization shall not conduct a raffle authorized under this section, unless it has a valid registration issued by the Department of Justice. The department shall furnish a registration form via the internet or upon request to eligible nonprofit organizations. The department shall, by regulation, collect only the information necessary to carry out the provisions of this section on this form. This information shall include, but is not limited to, all of the following:

(i) The name and address of the eligible organization.

(ii) The federal tax identification number, the corporate number issued by the Secretary of State, the organization number issued
 by the Franchise Tax Board, or the California charitable trust identification number of the eligible organization.

(iii) The name and title of a responsible fiduciary of the organization.

(B) (i) The department may require an eligible organization to pay a minimum annual registration fee of ten thousand dollars ($10,000) to cover the reasonable costs of the department to administer and enforce this section.

(ii) An eligible organization shall pay, in addition to the annual registration application fee, two hundred dollars ($200) for every individual raffle conducted at an eligible location to cover the reasonable costs of the department to administer and enforce this section. This fee shall be submitted in conjunction with the annual registration form.

(2) (A) A manufacturer or distributor of raffle-related products or services shall not conduct business with an eligible organization for purposes of conducting a raffle pursuant to this section unless the manufacturer or distributor has a valid annual registration issued by the department.

(B) The department may require a manufacturer or distributor of raffle-related products or services to pay a minimum annual registration fee of ten thousand dollars ($10,000) to cover the reasonable costs of the department to administer and enforce this section.

(3) An eligible organization shall register the equipment used in the sale and distribution of raffle tickets, and shall have the equipment tested by an independent gaming testing lab.

(4) (A) A person affiliated with an eligible organization who conducts the manual draw shall annually register with the department.

(B) The department may require a person affiliated with an eligible organization who conducts the manual draw to pay a minimum annual registration fee of twenty dollars ($20) to cover the reasonable costs of the department to administer and enforce this section.

(5) (A) The department may, by regulation, adjust the annual registration fees described in this section as needed to ensure that revenues will fully offset, but not exceed, the reasonable costs incurred by the department pursuant to this section. The fees shall be deposited by the department into the Major League Sporting Event Raffle Fund, which is hereby created in the State Treasury.

(B) A loan is hereby authorized from the General Fund to the Major League Sporting Event Raffle Fund on or after July 1, 2016, in an amount of up to one million five thousand dollars ($1,005,000) to address department workload related to the initial implementation activities relating to this section by the department’s Indian and Gaming Law Section. The terms and conditions of the loan shall first be approved by the Department of Finance pursuant to appropriate fiscal standards. The loan shall be subject to all of the following conditions:

(i) Of the total amount loaned, no more than three hundred thirty-five thousand dollars ($335,000) shall be provided annually to the department.

(ii) The loan shall be repaid to the General Fund as soon as there is sufficient money in the Major League Sporting Event Raffle Fund to repay
 the loan, but no later than December 31, 2023.

(iii) Interest on the loan shall be paid from the Major League Sporting Event Raffle Fund at the rate accruing to moneys in the Pooled Money Investment Account.

(6) The department shall receive moneys for the costs incurred pursuant to this section subject to an appropriation by the Legislature.

(7) The department shall adopt regulations necessary to effectuate this section, including emergency regulations, pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(8) The department shall maintain an automated database of all registrants.

(9) A local
 law enforcement agency shall notify the department of any arrests or investigation that may result in an administrative or criminal action against a registrant.

(10) The department may, to the extent the Legislature appropriates funds for this purpose, investigate all suspected violations of this section or any regulation adopted pursuant to this section, or any activity that the registrant has engaged in that is not in the best interests of the public’s health, safety, or general welfare as it pertains to charitable raffles.

(11) The department may, to the extent the Legislature appropriates funds for this purpose, audit the records and other documents of a registrant to ensure compliance with this section.

(12) Once registered, an eligible organization shall post all of the following information on either its
 internet website or the affiliated sport team’s internet website for each raffle:

(A) The gross receipts generated from the sale of raffle tickets.

(B) Each eligible recipient organization and the amount each eligible recipient organization received.
